Utah statutes.
4-13-9.   Sales or exchanges of commercial fertilizers or soil amendments
between manufacturers, importers, or manipulators permitted.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict or avoid sales or
exchanges of commercial fertilizers or soil amendments to each other by
importers, manufacturers, or manipulators who mix fertilizer or soil amendment
materials for sale or as preventing the free and unrestricted shipment of
commercial fertilizer or soil amendments to manufacturers or manipulators who
have registered their brands as required by this chapter.
